Nebraska, session 109, LB806.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB806 LB806
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-12,147, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-12,147 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the Department of Economic Development shall use the Site and Building
Development Fund to finance loans, grants, subsidies, credit
enhancements, and other financial assistance for industrial site and
building development and for expenses of the department as appropriated
by the Legislature for administering the fund. The following activities
are eligible for assistance from the fund:
(a) Grants or zero-interest loans to villages, cities, or counties
to acquire land, infuse infrastructure, or otherwise make large sites and
buildings ready for industrial development;
(b) Matching funds for new construction, rehabilitation, or
acquisition of land and buildings to assist villages, cities, and
counties;
(c) Technical assistance, design and finance services, and
consultation for villages, cities, and counties for the preparation and
creation of industrial-ready sites and buildings;
(d) Loan guarantees for eligible projects;
(e) Projects making industrial-ready sites and buildings more
accessible to business and industry;
(f) Infrastructure projects necessary for the development of
industrial-ready sites and buildings;
(g) Projects that mitigate the economic impact of a closure or
downsizing of a private-sector entity by making necessary improvements to
buildings and infrastructure;
(h) Public and private sector initiatives that will improve the
military value of military installations by making necessary improvements
to buildings and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, a grant
for the establishment of the United States Strategic Command Nuclear
Command, Control, and Communications public-private-partnership facility;
-2-

LB806 LB806
2026 2026
(i) A grant to a city of the second class that is served by two
first-class railroads, that is within fifteen miles of two state borders,
and that partners with public power utilities for purposes of expanding
electrical system capacities and enhancing redundancy and resilience;
(j) A grant of two million dollars to a city of the first class
located in the third congressional district if the property previously
housed a university or college that is no longer extant and if the
improvement and revitalization of the real property is for purposes of
supporting the housing, employment, and program needs of youth exiting
the foster care system. In addition, the real property may be used for
youth exiting juvenile court supervision in an out-of-home placement;
(k) Public and private sector initiatives that will improve the
value of cities of the second class that have partnered with the United
States Department of Defense or its contractors on upgrades to ground-
based nuclear deterrence. Such improvements include the construction of
electrical, drinking water, and clean water infrastructure; and
(l) Identification, evaluation, and development of large commercial
and industrial sites and building infrastructure to attract major
investment and employment opportunities for advanced manufacturing,
processing, trade, technology, aerospace, automotive, clean energy, life
science, and other transformational industries in Nebraska by means of
the department providing grants to or partnering with political
subdivisions, including inland port authorities under the Municipal
Inland Port Authority Act, or nonprofit economic development corporations
and entering into contracts for consulting, engineering, and development
studies to identify, evaluate, and develop large commercial and
industrial sites in Nebraska; and .
(m) A grant to a city of the first class in a county with a
population of less than fifty thousand inhabitants impacted by a sudden
and significant private-sector entity closure or downsizing that will
have a significant impact on the community. The grant shall be used to
-3-

LB806 LB806
2026 2026
mitigate the economic impact of the closure or downsizing by making
necessary improvements to the buildings or infrastructure related to the
assets of the private-sector entity.
(2) The Department of Economic Development shall use the subaccount
of the Site and Building Development Fund described in subsection (2) of
section 81-12,146 to provide financial assistance to any inland port
authority created under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act to help
finance large shovel-ready commercial and industrial sites developed
under such act.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate XX dollars
from the General Fund for purposes of carrying out subdivision (1)(m) of
this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-12,147, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-